Maryland, session 2026, HB0853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 8–403(13) through (65) of Article – State Government of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 8–403(14) through (66), respectively.

HOUSE BILL 853 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
TITLE 22. COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
22–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BOARD” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
(C) (1) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS:
(I) A CONDOMINIUM AS DEFINED IN § 11–101 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(II) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION AS DEFINED IN §
5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION AS DEFINED IN § 11B–101 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
TIME–SHARE PROJECT AS DEFINED IN § 11A–101 OF THE REAL PROPERTY
ARTICLE.
(D) “LICENSE” MEANS, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, A
LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE THAT ALLOWS
AN INDIVIDUAL TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
(E) “LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER” MEANS, UNLESS THE
CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ISSUED A LIMITED
LICENSE BY THE BOARD UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS TITLE TO PROVIDE
MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY UNDER THE
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER.

HOUSE BILL 853
(F) “LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER” MEANS, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
REQUIRES OTHERWISE, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ISSUED A LICENSE BY THE BOARD
UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(G) “LIMITED LICENSE” MEANS, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES
OTHERWISE, A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS
TITLE THAT ALLOWS THE INDIVIDUAL TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(H) “PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES” MEANS:
(1) TO ACT WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY IN ITS BUSINESS, LEGAL, FINANCIAL, OR OTHER TRANSACTIONS WITH
MEMBERS AND NONMEMBERS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(2) TO EXECUTE THE RESOLUTIONS AND DECISIONS OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(3) TO ENFORCE THE RIGHTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY SECURED BY STATUTE, CONTRACT, COVENANT, RULE, OR BYLAW WITH
THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(4) TO NEGOTIATE CONTRACTS OR OTHERWISE COORDINATE OR
ARRANGE FOR SERVICES OR THE PURCHASE OF PROPERTY AND GOODS FOR OR ON
BEHALF OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(5) TO COLLECT, DISBURSE, OR OTHERWISE EXERCISE DOMINION OR
CONTROL OVER MONEY OR OTHER PROPERTY BELONGING TO A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(6) TO PREPARE BUDGETS, FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, OR OTHER
FINANCIAL REPORTS FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(7) TO ARRANGE, CONDUCT, OR COORDINATE MEETINGS OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR
(8) TO OFFER OR SOLICIT TO PERFORM ANY OF THE ACTS OR
SERVICES LISTED IN ITEMS (1) THROUGH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON BEHALF OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.

HOUSE BILL 853 5
(I) “RESPONSIBLE MANAGER” MEANS A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER
WHO HAS PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITY FOR PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES TO A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY UNDER THE TERMS OF A CONTRACT ENTERED
INTO BY THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
22–102.
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE THAT REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO BE ISSUED
A LICENSE OR A LIMITED LICENSE DO NOT PROHIBIT:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A REGULAR, SALARIED EMPLOYEE OF A
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER OR A SINGLE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
FROM PERFORMING ADMINISTRATIVE, INTERNAL, BOOKKEEPING, OR MINISTERIAL
FUNCTIONS IN SUPPORT OF THE LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER OR THE SINGLE
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT STAFF OR AN
ASSISTANT OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER FROM INCIDENTALLY PROVIDING
MANAGEMENT SERVICES IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS SUPERVISED BY A LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER;
(3) A RESIDENT OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY WHO ACTS
WITHOUT COMPENSATION FROM PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR THAT
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(4) A MEMBER OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY WHO ACTS WITHOUT COMPENSATION FROM PROVIDING MANAGEMENT
SERVICES FOR THAT COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(5) AN ATTORNEY AT LAW FROM REPRESENTING A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER, OR A LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER IN ANY BUSINESS THAT CONSTITUTES THE
PRACTICE OF LAW;
(6) AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AS A LICENSED
CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT, A LICENSED REAL ESTATE BROKER, OR A
LICENSED ASSOCIATE REAL ESTATE BROKER FROM PROVIDING TO A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THE SERVICES FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS LICENSED;
(7) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ACTS AS A RECEIVER OR TRUSTEE IN
BANKRUPTCY IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTIES OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ACTS
UNDER A COURT ORDER FROM PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR

HOUSE BILL 853
(8) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AN EMPLOYEE OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY FROM PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES ONLY TO THAT COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR TO AN AFFILIATED COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
SUBTITLE 2. STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
22–201.
THERE IS A STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
22–202.
(A) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF NINE MEMBERS.
(2) OF THE NINE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD:
(I) FIVE SHALL BE LICENSED COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS;
(II) ONE SHALL BE A LAWYER, AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE, WHOSE PRIMARY PRACTICE INCLUDES THE REPRESENTATION OF
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(III) THREE SHALL BE RESIDENT OWNERS IN A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(3) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE MEMBERS WITH THE
ADVICE OF THE SECRETARY AND THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE.
(B) EACH MEMBER OF THE BOARD MUST BE A RESIDENT OF THE STATE.
(C) BEFORE TAKING OFFICE, EACH APPOINTEE TO THE BOARD SHALL TAKE
THE OATH REQUIRED BY ARTICLE I, § 9 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS AND BEGINS JULY 1.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON OCTOBER 1, 2027.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.

HOUSE BILL 853 7
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE
TERMS.
22–203.
FROM AMONG THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
APPOINT A CHAIR AND A VICE CHAIR.
22–204.
(A) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS THEN SERVING ON THE BOARD IS A
QUORUM.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS
MEETINGS.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(D) THE BOARD MAY EMPLOY STAFF IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE
BUDGET.
22–205.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY POWERS SET FORTH ELSEWHERE, THE BOARD
MAY:
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS AS NECESSARY TO DO THE BUSINESS OF THE
BOARD; AND
(2) ADOPT ANY REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS TITLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY DUTIES SET FORTH ELSEWHERE, THE BOARD
SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 853
(1) ADOPT RULES OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT AS APPROPRIATE FOR
INDIVIDUALS ISSUED A LICENSE OR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE;
(2) ESTABLISH CRITERIA AND A PROCESS FOR CERTIFICATION OF A
VARIETY OF EDUCATIONAL OFFERINGS AND TRAINING PROGRAMS FOR ISSUING
LICENSES OR LIMITED LICENSES UNDER THIS TITLE;
(3) ESTABLISH CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE BEEN ISSUED A LICENSE OR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER
THIS TITLE; AND
(4) KEEP A RECORD OF ITS PROCEEDINGS.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ESTABLISH BY REGULATION:
(1) THE PROCESS OF RESOLVING DISCIPLINARY MATTERS PENDING
BEFORE THE BOARD THROUGH NONJUDICIAL DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESSES;
(2) EDUCATION AND TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES FOR GOVERNING
BODIES OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES; AND
(3) ANY OTHER PROCEDURES OR STANDARDS CONSISTENT WITH THE
MISSION OF THE BOARD.
22–206.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN A PUBLIC LIST OF THE NAMES AND
MAILING ADDRESSES OF ALL INDIVIDUALS ISSUED A LICENSE OR A LIMITED
LICENSE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) EACH INDIVIDUAL ISSUED A LICENSE OR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER
THIS TITLE SHALL:
(1) DESIGNATE A MAILING ADDRESS AT THE TIME OF ISSUANCE OF
THE ORIGINAL LICENSE OR LIMITED LICENSE AND ON RENEWAL OF THE LICENSE OR
LIMITED LICENSE; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE BOARD OF A CHANGE OF ADDRESS WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER THE CHANGE.
22–207.
(A) (1) THE BOARD MAY SET BY REGULATION REASONABLE FEES FOR ITS
SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 853 9
(2) THE FEES CHARGED SHALL BE:
(I) SET SO AS TO PRODUCE FUNDS TO APPROXIMATE THE COST
OF MAINTAINING THE BOARD;
(II) BASED ON THE CALCULATIONS PERFORMED BY THE
SECRETARY UNDER § 2–106.18 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE; AND
(III) CONSISTENT WITH OTHER FEES FOR COMPARABLE
LICENSES ISSUED BY OTHER BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS IN THE STATE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THE FEE SCHEDULE SET BY THE BOARD.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ALL FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS TITLE
TO THE COMPTROLLER.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FEES TO THE STATE
BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 2–106.17 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE.
22–208.
THE BOARD EXERCISES ITS POWERS, DUTIES, AND FUNCTIONS SUBJECT TO
THE AUTHORITY OF THE SECRETARY.
22–209.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDY AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE,
THE BOARD, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, MAY SUE IN THE
NAME OF THE STATE TO ENJOIN ANY ACT THAT IS PROHIBITED UNDER SUBTITLE 7
OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTIONS TO:
(1) ASSIST A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN EXERCISING ANY
RIGHTS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(2) ENTER INTO COOPERATIVE AND INFORMATION–SHARING
AGREEMENTS WITH ANY UNIT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT AS ALLOWED BY LAW.
SUBTITLE 3. LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
22–301.

HOUSE BILL 853
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MUST BE ISSUED A LICENSE BY THE BOARD BEFORE
THE INDIVIDUAL MAY PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES AS A LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN THE STATE.
(B) A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER MAY PROVIDE MANAGEMENT
SERVICES FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY ONLY UNDER THE TERMS OF A
CONTRACT ENTERED INTO BY THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
22–302.
(A) TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT MUST BE AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO MEETS:
(1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ANY OTHER QUALIFICATION AS REQUIRED BY REGULATION OF
THE BOARD.
(B) AN APPLICANT MUST BE A LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY
MANAGER.
(C) AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE A TRAINING PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE BOARD; AND
(2) PASS AN EXAMINATION APPROVED BY THE BOARD THAT
INCLUDES TESTING OF KNOWLEDGE OF STATE LAWS AND REGULATIONS
CONCERNING COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
(D) AN APPLICANT MUST:
(1) BE ACTIVELY ENGAGED IN PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES
FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS AS A LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER BEFORE
APPLYING FOR A LICENSE; OR
(2) HOLD AN ACTIVE PROFESSIONAL DESIGNATION AS APPROVED BY
THE BOARD.
22–303.
AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION ON THE FORM THAT THE
BOARD PROVIDES; AND

HOUSE BILL 853 11
(2) PAY TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
22–304.
(A) IF AN APPLICANT QUALIFIES FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE,
THE BOARD SHALL SEND THE APPLICANT A NOTICE THAT STATES THAT:
(1) THE APPLICANT HAS QUALIFIED FOR A LICENSE; AND
(2) ON RECEIPT OF THE LICENSE FEE SET BY THE BOARD, THE BOARD
WILL ISSUE A LICENSE TO THE APPLICANT.
(B) ON PAYMENT OF THE LICENSE FEE, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE A LICENSE
TO EACH APPLICANT WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
22–305.
WHILE IN EFFECT, A LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSED COMMUNITY
MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY.
22–306.
(A) THE TERM OF A LICENSE IS 2 YEARS.
(B) AT LEAST 2 MONTHS BEFORE A LICENSE EXPIRES, THE BOARD SHALL
SEND TO THE LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER, AT THE LAST KNOWN ADDRESS OF
THE LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER:
(1) A RENEWAL APPLICATION FORM; AND
(2) A NOTICE THAT STATES:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CURRENT LICENSE EXPIRES;
(II) THE DATE BY WHICH THE BOARD MUST RECEIVE THE
RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR THE RENEWAL TO BE ISSUED AND MAILED BEFORE THE
LICENSE EXPIRES; AND
(III) THE AMOUNT OF THE RENEWAL FEE.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL RENEW THE LICENSE OF AND ISSUE A
RENEWAL CERTIFICATE TO EACH LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER WHO MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 853
(2) THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE ON EACH RENEWAL CERTIFICATE
THE DATE ON WHICH THE CURRENT LICENSE EXPIRES.
22–307.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL REINSTATE THE LICENSE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
HAS FAILED TO RENEW THE LICENSE IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) APPLIES TO THE BOARD FOR REINSTATEMENT WITHIN 2 YEARS
AFTER THE LICENSE EXPIRES;
(2) MEETS THE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS OF § 22–306 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(3) PAYS TO THE BOARD A REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
(B) (1) IF AN INDIVIDUAL HAS FAILED TO RENEW A LICENSE AND THEN
APPLIES TO THE BOARD FOR REINSTATEMENT MORE THAN 2 YEARS AFTER THE
LICENSE HAS EXPIRED, THE BOARD:
(I) MAY REQUIRE THE INDIVIDUAL TO REAPPLY FOR A LICENSE
IN THE SAME MANNER AS AN APPLICANT APPLIES FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAY
REINSTATE THE LICENSE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY REINSTATE A LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) MEETS THE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS OF § 22–306 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) IF REQUIRED BY THE BOARD, STATES REASONS WHY
REINSTATEMENT SHOULD BE GRANTED; AND
(III) PAYS TO THE BOARD A REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE
BOARD.
22–308.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE
BY RECIPROCITY A LICENSE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS THE EQUIVALENT LICENSE
IN ANOTHER STATE OR TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES.

HOUSE BILL 853 13
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE
APPLICANT:
(1) PAYS TO THE BOARD A LICENSE FEE SET BY THE BOARD; AND
(2) PROVIDES ADEQUATE EVIDENCE THAT AT THE TIME OF
APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE UNDER THIS SECTION THE APPLICANT HAS MET
REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THE STATE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH STANDARDS FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A
LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION.
22–309.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 22–311 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE BOARD MAY DENY A LICENSE TO ANY APPLICANT, REPRIMAND ANY LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER, OR SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LICENSE IF THE APPLICANT OR
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER:
(1) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY OBTAINS OR ATTEMPTS TO
OBTAIN A LICENSE FOR THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER OR
FOR ANOTHER;
(2) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY USES A LICENSE;
(3) UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR OF ANY STATE, IS
CONVICTED OF:
(I) A FELONY; OR
(II) A MISDEMEANOR THAT IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE
FITNESS AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED COMMUNITY
MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(4) ENGAGES IN CONDUCT THAT DEMONSTRATES BAD FAITH,
INCOMPETENCY, OR UNTRUSTWORTHINESS OR THAT CONSTITUTES DISHONEST,
FRAUDULENT, OR IMPROPER DEALINGS;
(5) FAILS TO HANDLE THE FUNDS OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 853
(6) FAILS TO ACCOUNT IN A TIMELY MANNER FOR ALL MONEY AND
PROPERTY RECEIVED ON BEHALF OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(7) WILLFULLY FAILS TO DISCLOSE TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MATERIAL FACTS THAT RELATE TO THE PROPERTY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR CONCERN MANAGEMENT SERVICES OF WHICH THE
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER HAS ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE;
(8) IS GUILTY OF GROSS NEGLIGENCE, INCOMPETENCE THAT IS
PROVEN TO HAVE BEEN DETRIMENTAL TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, OR
MISCONDUCT IN PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(9) HAS BEEN SANCTIONED IN ANOTHER STATE IN A MATTER
RELATING TO PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(10) VIOLATES ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE; OR
(11) VIOLATES ANY REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE BOARD UNDER
THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) INSTEAD OF OR IN ADDITION TO REPRIMANDING THE LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER OR SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A LICENSE UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE BOARD MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH
VIOLATION.
(2) TO DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) THE HARM CAUSED BY THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE GOOD FAITH OF THE LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER;
AND
(IV) ANY HISTORY OF PREVIOUS VIOLATIONS BY THE LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTS IN THE
GRANTING, DENIAL, RENEWAL, SUSPENSION, OR REVOCATION OF A LICENSE OR THE
REPRIMAND OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER WHEN AN APPLICANT OR A

HOUSE BILL 853 15
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER IS CONVICTED OF A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) THE NATURE OF THE CRIME;
(2) THE RELATIONSHIP OF THE CRIME TO THE ACTIVITIES
AUTHORIZED BY THE LICENSE;
(3) WITH RESPECT TO A FELONY, THE RELEVANCE OF THE
CONVICTION TO THE FITNESS AND QUALIFICATION OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(4) THE LENGTH OF TIME SINCE THE CONVICTION; AND
(5) THE BEHAVIOR AND ACTIVITIES OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER BEFORE AND AFTER THE CONVICTION.
22–310.
ON ITS OWN INITIATIVE OR ON A WRITTEN COMPLAINT MADE TO THE BOARD
BY ANY PERSON, THE BOARD MAY COMMENCE PROCEEDINGS UNDER § 22–311 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
22–311.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–226 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BEFORE THE BOARD TAKES ANY FINAL ACTION UNDER §
22–309 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL GIVE THE INDIVIDUAL AGAINST
WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING BEFORE
THE BOARD.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE NOTICE AND HOLD THE HEARING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ADMINISTER OATHS IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR THE ATTENDANCE OF A
WITNESS TO TESTIFY OR THE PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, ON PETITION OF THE BOARD, A CIRCUIT COURT MAY COMPEL
COMPLIANCE WITH THE SUBPOENA.

HOUSE BILL 853
(E) IF, AFTER DUE NOTICE, THE INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS
CONTEMPLATED FAILS OR REFUSES TO APPEAR, THE BOARD MAY HEAR AND
DETERMINE THE MATTER.
22–312.
ANY PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A FINAL DECISION OF THE BOARD IN A
CONTESTED CASE, AS DEFINED IN § 10–202 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
IS ENTITLED TO JUDICIAL REVIEW AS PROVIDED IN §§ 10–222 AND 10–223 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
22–313.
THE BOARD MAY REINSTATE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCEDURES OF
THE BOARD:
(1) A LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN REVOKED; OR
(2) BEFORE FULFILLMENT OF THE CONDITIONS OF THE SUSPENSION,
ANY LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN SUSPENDED.
SUBTITLE 4. LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
22–401.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MUST BE ISSUED A LIMITED LICENSE BY THE BOARD
BEFORE THE INDIVIDUAL MAY PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES AS A LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN THE
STATE.
(B) A LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER MAY PROVIDE
MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY ONLY WHILE
UNDER THE GENERAL SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER.
22–402.
(A) TO QUALIFY FOR A LIMITED LICENSE, AN APPLICANT MUST BE AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS:
(1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ANY OTHER QUALIFICATION REQUIRED BY REGULATION OF THE
BOARD.

HOUSE BILL 853 17
(B) AN APPLICANT MUST BE AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD.
(C) AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE A TRAINING PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE BOARD; AND
(2) PASS AN EXAMINATION APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
22–403.
AN APPLICANT FOR A LIMITED LICENSE SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION ON THE FORM THAT THE
BOARD PROVIDES; AND
(2) PAY TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
22–404.
(A) IF AN APPLICANT QUALIFIES FOR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL SEND THE APPLICANT A NOTICE THAT STATES THAT:
(1) THE APPLICANT HAS QUALIFIED FOR A LIMITED LICENSE; AND
(2) ON RECEIPT OF THE LIMITED LICENSE FEE SET BY THE BOARD,
THE BOARD WILL ISSUE A LIMITED LICENSE IN THE NAME OF THE APPLICANT.
(B) ON PAYMENT OF THE LIMITED LICENSE FEE, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE
A LIMITED LICENSE IN THE NAME OF EACH APPLICANT WHO MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL DELIVER A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD
TO THE LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER WHO WILL BE SUPERVISING THE
LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER, AT THE ADDRESS OF THE LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER THAT IS INDICATED IN THE APPLICATION FOR A LIMITED
LICENSE.
22–405.
WHILE IN EFFECT, A LIMITED LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY ONLY WHILE UNDER THE GENERAL SUPERVISION
OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER.
22–406.

HOUSE BILL 853
(A) THE TERM OF A LIMITED LICENSE IS 2 YEARS.
(B) AT LEAST 2 MONTHS BEFORE A LIMITED LICENSE EXPIRES, THE BOARD
SHALL SEND TO THE LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER, AT THE LAST
KNOWN ADDRESS OF THE LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER:
(1) A RENEWAL APPLICATION FORM; AND
(2) A NOTICE THAT STATES:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CURRENT LIMITED LICENSE
EXPIRES;
(II) THE DATE BY WHICH THE BOARD MUST RECEIVE THE
RENEWAL APPLICATION FOR THE RENEWAL TO BE ISSUED AND MAILED BEFORE THE
LIMITED LICENSE EXPIRES; AND
(III) THE AMOUNT OF THE RENEWAL FEE.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL RENEW THE LIMITED LICENSE OF AND ISSUE
A RENEWAL CERTIFICATE TO EACH LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER
WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE ON EACH RENEWAL CERTIFICATE
THE DATE ON WHICH THE CURRENT LIMITED LICENSE EXPIRES.
22–407.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL REINSTATE THE LIMITED LICENSE OF AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS FAILED TO RENEW THE LIMITED LICENSE IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) APPLIES TO THE BOARD FOR REINSTATEMENT WITHIN 2 YEARS
AFTER THE LIMITED LICENSE EXPIRES;
(2) MEETS THE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS OF § 22–406 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(3) PAYS TO THE BOARD A REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
(B) (1) IF AN INDIVIDUAL HAS FAILED TO RENEW A LIMITED LICENSE AND
THEN APPLIES TO THE BOARD FOR REINSTATEMENT MORE THAN 2 YEARS AFTER
THE LIMITED LICENSE HAS EXPIRED, THE BOARD:

HOUSE BILL 853 19
(I) MAY REQUIRE THE INDIVIDUAL TO REAPPLY FOR A LIMITED
LICENSE IN THE SAME MANNER AS AN APPLICANT APPLIES FOR AN ORIGINAL
LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAY
REINSTATE THE LIMITED LICENSE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY REINSTATE A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) MEETS THE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS OF § 22–406 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) IF REQUIRED BY THE BOARD, STATES REASONS WHY
REINSTATEMENT SHOULD BE GRANTED; AND
(III) PAYS TO THE BOARD A REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE
BOARD.
22–408.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 22–410 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE BOARD MAY DENY A LIMITED LICENSE TO ANY APPLICANT, REPRIMAND ANY
LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER, OR SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LIMITED
LICENSE IF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER:
(1) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY OBTAINS OR ATTEMPTS TO
OBTAIN A LIMITED LICENSE FOR THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED ASSOCIATE
COMMUNITY MANAGER OR FOR ANOTHER;
(2) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY USES A LIMITED LICENSE;
(3) UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR OF ANY STATE, IS
CONVICTED OF:
(I) A FELONY; OR
(II) A MISDEMEANOR THAT IS DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE
FITNESS AND QUALIFICATIONS OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED ASSOCIATE
COMMUNITY MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(4) ENGAGES IN CONDUCT THAT DEMONSTRATES BAD FAITH,
INCOMPETENCY, OR UNTRUSTWORTHINESS OR THAT CONSTITUTES DISHONEST,
FRAUDULENT, OR IMPROPER DEALINGS;

HOUSE BILL 853
(5) FAILS TO HANDLE THE FUNDS OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE;
(6) FAILS TO ACCOUNT IN A TIMELY MANNER FOR ALL MONEY AND
PROPERTY RECEIVED ON BEHALF OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(7) WILLFULLY FAILS TO DISCLOSE TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MATERIAL FACTS THAT RELATE TO THE PROPERTY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY OR CONCERN MANAGEMENT SERVICES OF WHICH THE
LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER HAS ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE;
(8) IS GUILTY OF GROSS NEGLIGENCE, INCOMPETENCE THAT IS
PROVEN TO HAVE BEEN DETRIMENTAL TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, OR
MISCONDUCT IN PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(9) HAS BEEN SANCTIONED IN ANOTHER STATE IN A MATTER
RELATING TO PROVIDING MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(10) VIOLATES ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE; OR
(11) VIOLATES ANY REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE BOARD UNDER
THIS TITLE.
(B) (1) INSTEAD OF OR IN ADDITION TO REPRIMANDING THE LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER OR SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A LIMITED
LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE BOARD MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT
EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(2) TO DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) THE HARM CAUSED BY THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE GOOD FAITH OF THE LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY
MANAGER; AND
(IV) ANY HISTORY OF PREVIOUS VIOLATIONS BY THE LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 853 21
(C) THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTS IN THE
GRANTING, DENIAL, RENEWAL, SUSPENSION, OR REVOCATION OF A LIMITED
LICENSE OR THE REPRIMAND OF A LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER
WHEN AN APPLICANT OR A LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER IS
CONVICTED OF A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF
THIS SECTION:
(1) THE NATURE OF THE CRIME;
(2) THE RELATIONSHIP OF THE CRIME TO THE ACTIVITIES
AUTHORIZED BY THE LIMITED LICENSE;
(3) WITH RESPECT TO A FELONY, THE RELEVANCE OF THE
CONVICTION TO THE FITNESS AND QUALIFICATION OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(4) THE LENGTH OF TIME SINCE THE CONVICTION; AND
(5) THE BEHAVIOR AND ACTIVITIES OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSED
ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER BEFORE AND AFTER THE CONVICTION.
22–409.
ON ITS OWN INITIATIVE OR ON A WRITTEN COMPLAINT MADE TO THE BOARD
BY ANY PERSON, THE BOARD MAY COMMENCE PROCEEDINGS UNDER § 22–410 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
22–410.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN § 10–226 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, BEFORE THE BOARD TAKES ANY FINAL ACTION UNDER §
22–408 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL GIVE THE INDIVIDUAL AGAINST
WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING BEFORE
THE BOARD.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE NOTICE AND HOLD THE HEARING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ADMINISTER OATHS IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 853
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR THE ATTENDANCE OF A
WITNESS TO TESTIFY OR THE PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, ON PETITION OF THE BOARD, A CIRCUIT COURT MAY COMPEL
COMPLIANCE WITH THE SUBPOENA.
(E) IF, AFTER DUE NOTICE, THE INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS
CONTEMPLATED FAILS OR REFUSES TO APPEAR, THE BOARD MAY HEAR AND
DETERMINE THE MATTER.
22–411.
ANY PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A FINAL DECISION OF THE BOARD IN A
CONTESTED CASE, AS DEFINED IN § 10–202 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
IS ENTITLED TO JUDICIAL REVIEW AS PROVIDED IN §§ 10–222 AND 10–223 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
22–412.
THE BOARD MAY REINSTATE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCEDURES OF
THE BOARD:
(1) A LIMITED LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN REVOKED; OR
(2) BEFORE FULFILLMENT OF THE CONDITIONS OF THE SUSPENSION,
ANY LIMITED LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN SUSPENDED.
SUBTITLE 5. REGISTRATION OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES.
22–501.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY SHALL REGISTER WITH THE BOARD.
(B) IF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY CONTRACTS FOR MANAGEMENT
SERVICES, THE RESPONSIBLE MANAGER SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
REGISTRATION OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
22–502.
EACH COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL PROVIDE THE BOARD THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:

HOUSE BILL 853 23
(1) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY;
(2) THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IS
LOCATED;
(3) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF EACH OFFICER AND
MEMBER OF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY;
(4) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE LICENSED COMMUNITY
MANAGER, IF ANY, FOR THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; AND
(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
SUBTITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS.
22–601.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONTRACTING PARTY” MEANS A LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER OR A PERSON UNDER THE DIRECTION OF A LICENSED
COMMUNITY MANAGER THAT CONTRACTS TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR
A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) A CONTRACTING PARTY SHALL FILE WITH THE SECRETARY PROOF AS
REQUIRED BY THE BOARD OF A FIDELITY BOND OR THEFT INSURANCE, OR OTHER
COMPARABLE WRITTEN INSURANCE AS REQUIRED BY THE BOARD, THAT COVERS:
(1) ANY PERSON THAT PROVIDES MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY UNDER THE TERMS OF A CONTRACT; AND
(2) ANY INDIVIDUAL WORKING UNDER THE DIRECTION OF A PERSON
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) A FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE FOR WHICH PROOF IS FILED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
LESSER OF:
(I) $2,000,000; OR
(II) THE HIGHEST AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF THE OPERATING
AND RESERVE BALANCES OF ALL COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITIES UNDER
CONTRACT WITH THE CONTRACTING PARTY IN THE PRIOR 3 MONTHS.

HOUSE BILL 853
(2) THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF THE INSURANCE TO ALL INSURED
PERSONS UNDER A FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE MAY NOT EXCEED THE SUM OF
THE FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE.
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE, SHALL BE
NAMED AS A CERTIFICATE HOLDER FOR ANY FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) IF THE FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE IS CANCELED, FORFEITED, OR
TERMINATED, THE CONTRACTING PARTY IMMEDIATELY SHALL NOTIFY THE
SECRETARY.
(E) IF THE FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE IS CANCELED, FORFEITED, OR
TERMINATED, OR THE CONTRACTING PARTY FAILS TO NOTIFY THE SECRETARY OF
ANY CHANGE TO THE FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE, THE SECRETARY:
(1) SHALL SUSPEND ANY LICENSE OF ANY INDIVIDUAL PROVIDING
MANAGEMENT SERVICES COVERED BY THE FIDELITY BOND OR INSURANCE; AND
(2) MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE UNTIL PROOF OF COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION IS PROVIDED TO THE SECRETARY.
22–602.
(A) A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER SHALL DEPOSIT ALL MONEY
RECEIVED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES IN
ONE OR MORE OF THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNTS OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(B) A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER WHO PROVIDES MANAGEMENT
SERVICES FOR MORE THAN ONE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL
MAINTAIN SEPARATE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNTS FOR EACH COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(C) THE FUNDS IN EACH FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNT OF A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MAY NOT BE COMMINGLED WITH THE FUNDS OF THE
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER OR ANOTHER COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(D) THE MAINTENANCE OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNTS BY A
LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER SHALL BE CUSTODIAL AND PROVIDED IN THE
NAME OF THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.

HOUSE BILL 853 25
(E) THE RECORDS OF EACH FINANCIAL INSTITUTION ACCOUNT OF A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY SHALL BE ACCESSIBLE FOR REVIEW DIRECTLY
FROM THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION TO THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
(F) A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER WHO WILLFULLY VIOLATES ANY
PROVISION OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5
YEARS OR BOTH.
22–603.
IF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY CONTRACTS WITH A PERSON OTHER
THAN A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES,
THE CONTRACT SHALL REQUIRE THAT ONLY A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER
PROVIDE THE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR THE COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY.
SUBTITLE 7. PROHIBITED ACTS; PENALTIES.
22–701.
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT
PROVIDE, ATTEMPT TO PROVIDE, OR OFFER TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES
FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN THE STATE UNLESS ISSUED A LICENSE
OR A LIMITED LICENSE BY THE BOARD.
22–702.
UNLESS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT
SERVICES TO A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY, A PERSON MAY NOT REPRESENT
TO THE PUBLIC BY USE OF A TITLE, INCLUDING “LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER”,
“LICENSED ASSOCIATE COMMUNITY MANAGER”, OR “COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGEMENT”, BY USE OF AN ABBREVIATION, BY DESCRIPTION OF
SERVICES, METHODS, OR PROCEDURES, OR OTHERWISE THAT THE PERSON IS
AUTHORIZED TO PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY IN THE STATE.
22–703.
AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT:
(1) USE OR ATTEMPT TO USE THE LICENSE OR LIMITED LICENSE OF
ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL; OR

HOUSE BILL 853
(2) IMPERSONATE ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS A LICENSE OR
A LIMITED LICENSE.
22–704.
AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT GIVE FALSE INFORMATION TO THE BOARD IN AN
ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN A LICENSE OR A LIMITED LICENSE.
22–705.
AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE LICENSE OR LIMITED LICENSE HAS BEEN SUSPENDED
OR REVOKED UNDER THIS TITLE MAY NOT PROVIDE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A
COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IN ANY MANNER AS:
(1) AN ASSOCIATE, AN AGENT, AN EMPLOYEE, OR ANY OTHER
SUBORDINATE OF A LICENSED COMMUNITY MANAGER; OR
(2) A PRINCIPAL, AN ASSOCIATE, AN AGENT, AN EMPLOYEE, OR ANY
OTHER SUBORDINATE OF A CORPORATION, PARTNERSHIP, OR LIMITED LIABILITY
COMPANY THAT PROVIDES MANAGEMENT SERVICES.
22–706.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR BOTH.
(B) (1) THE BOARD MAY IMPOSE ON A PERSON THAT VIOLATES ANY
PROVISION OF THIS TITLE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(2) IN SETTING THE AMOUNT OF THE PENALTY, THE BOARD SHALL
CONSIDER:
(I) THE SERIOUSNESS OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) THE HARM CAUSED BY THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE GOOD FAITH OF THE VIOLATOR;
(IV) ANY HISTORY OF PREVIOUS VIOLATIONS BY THE VIOLATOR;
AND
(V) ANY OTHER RELEVANT FACTORS.

HOUSE BILL 853 27
(C) THE BOARD SHALL PAY ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
SUBTITLE 8. SHORT TITLE; TERMINATION OF TITLE.
22–801.
THIS TITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS ACT.
22–802.
SUBJECT TO THE EVALUATION AND REESTABLISHMENT PROVISIONS OF THE
MARYLAND PROGRAM EVALUATION ACT, THIS TITLE AND ALL REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL TERMINATE AND BE OF NO EFFECT AFTER JULY
1, 2032.
Article – Business Regulation
2–106.17.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS FUND.
(B) THERE IS A STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MANAGERS FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO COVER THE ACTUAL DOCUMENTED
DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF FULFILLING THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
DUTIES OF THE BOARD.
(D) THE SECRETARY OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE SHALL ADMINISTER
THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 853
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) FEES COLLECTED BY THE BOARD AND DISTRIBUTED TO THE
FUND UNDER § 22–207 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND;
(3) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO COVER THE ACTUAL DOCUMENTED
DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF FULFILLING THE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
DUTIES OF THE BOARD.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR SHALL AUDIT THE ACCOUNTS AND
TRANSACTIONS OF THE FUND, AS PROVIDED IN § 2–1220 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
2–106.18.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “BOARD” MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS.
(B) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE BOARD, THE SECRETARY SHALL
CALCULATE ANNUALLY THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
BOARD.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH FEES BASED ON THE CALCULATIONS
PROVIDED BY THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 853 29
(D) EACH FEE ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD MAY NOT BE INCREASED
ANNUALLY BY MORE THAN 12.5% OF THE EXISTING AND CORRESPONDING FEE OF
THE BOARD.
2–108.
(a) The following units are in the Department:
(34) THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY
MANAGERS.
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–12.1.
A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL REGISTER ANNUALLY WITH
THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS IN THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AS REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 22, SUBTITLE 5
OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
Article – Real Property
11–130.1.
A CONDOMINIUM THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES SHALL
REGISTER ANNUALLY WITH THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS IN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AS REQUIRED
UNDER TITLE 22, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE.
11B–115.2.
A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL REGISTER ANNUALLY WITH THE STATE
BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AS REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 22, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE
BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the

HOUSE BILL 853
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE STATE BOARD OF COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY MANAGERS FUND.
Article – State Government
8–403.
This subtitle applies only to the following governmental activities and units:
(13) COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY MANAGERS, STATE BOARD
OF (§ 22–201 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE);
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the State Board of Common Ownership Community Managers shall expire as
follows:
(1) three members in 2030;
(2) three members in 2031; and
(3) three members in 2032.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Board of Common
Ownership Community Managers, when adopting regulations concerning the training and
examination requirements for an applicant for a license or a limited license under this Act,
may take into consideration the following training and examination standards:
(1) for a limited license:
(i) courses that include topics such as:
1. the responsibilities of managers and members of
community governing bodies;

HOUSE BILL 853 31
2. management ethics;
3. community rules;
4. community meetings and other communications;
5. assessments collections;
6. financial management;
7. risk management;
8. facilities management; and
9. personnel management; and
(ii) examinations that may be in a classroom or online; and
(2) for a license:
(i) courses that include topics such as:
1. high–rise maintenance and management;
2. advanced insurance and risk management;
3. management of large–scale communities;
4. legal considerations in community management; and
5. contemporary issues in community management; and
(ii) examinations that include a case study of an existing common
ownership community.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Until the time that the State Board of Common Ownership Community
Managers adopts regulations concerning the training and examination requirements for an
applicant for a license or a limited license under this Act, passing an examination that
meets the requirements listed in subsection (b) of this section shall be deemed adequate for
satisfying the requirements of § 22–302(c) or § 22–402(c) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act.
(b) The examination specified under subsection (a) of this section shall be:

HOUSE BILL 853
(1) a nationally prepared and administered standardized examination for
the community association management profession; and
(2) developed according to the basic principles of professional testing
standards that utilize psychometric measurement.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Board of Common
Ownership Community Managers shall grant a waiver of the training and examination
requirements for a license issued under § 22–304 or a limited license issued under §
22–404 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this
Act, to any applicant who presents to the Board not later than October 1, 2029, satisfactory
evidence that the applicant provided management services in the State for the 2 years
immediately before the date of application.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the Maryland Department of Labor shall report to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the imposition of a
registration fee on common ownership communities, including the necessity for and amount
of a registration fee on common ownership communities in relation to the license fees and
limited license fees required under this Act and the size of a common ownership community
to which a registration fee would apply.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Department of Budget
and Management, by budget amendment, may advance sufficient funds to the State Board
of Common Ownership Community Managers to allow the Board to commence operations
on October 1, 2027, so that the functions of issuing licenses and limited licenses and
registering common ownership communities can be in place before October 1, 2028. The
Board shall reimburse any funds that have been advanced after the license fees and limited
license fees have been received and deposited into the State Board of Common Ownership
Community Managers Fund.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.